Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.43
Use-based exemption, defined.

Use-based exemption means an exemption based on a specified use of the product by the purchaser.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 47;

Laws 2006, LB 887, § 3.